lexc/verb/enhuige8.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§ 
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§ §j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ §oe2§ §ae2§
§felteo1§ §sj§ §igeoe§ §igeoue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ §igeuomely§
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§ §oe2mely§
§felteo1mely§ §szorelolmely§ §l§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb1
együttfut AddVerbfut;
együttlüktet AddVerb;
elévet AddVerb;
feljebbjut AddVerbfut;
helybenfut AddVerbfut;
közéjut AddVerbfut;
odábbfut AddVerbfut;
odébbvet AddVerb;
szemrevet AddVerb;
számkivet AddVerb;

!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;
LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper1;

LEXICON NImper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;

LEXICON NImper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                  Case;

LEXICON Verb
büntet AddVerb;
csökkentet AddVerb;
csöpögtet AddVerb;
csörrentet AddVerb;
csörtet AddVerb;
csüggesztet AddVerb;
döcögtet AddVerb;
döglesztet AddVerb;
döntet AddVerb;
düllesztet AddVerb;
erőltet AddVerb;
esőztet AddVerb;
függesztet AddVerb;
füllesztet AddVerb;
fürösztet AddVerb;
gyökereztet AddVerb;
gyönyörködtet AddVerb;
gyümölcsöztet AddVerb;
gyűjtet AddVerb;
görnyesztet AddVerb;
gőzölögtet AddVerb;
hökkentet AddVerb;
hörpentet AddVerb;
hörpintet AddVerb;
kettőztet AddVerb;
köhögtet AddVerb;
költet AddVerb;
költöztet AddVerb;
köpesztet AddVerb;
köpet AddVerb;
köptet AddVerb;
köröztet AddVerb;
köszöntet AddVerb;
köttet AddVerb;
különböztet AddVerb;
lepötyögtet AddVerb;
levegőztet AddVerb;
löttyentet AddVerb;
lötyögtet AddVerb;
lüktet AddVerb;
működtet AddVerb;
műveltet AddVerb;
növesztet AddVerb;
pöccentet AddVerb;
pöccintet AddVerb;
pöcögtet AddVerb;
pötyögtet AddVerb;
püffesztet AddVerb;
röhögtet AddVerb;
röptet AddVerb;
szegődtet AddVerb;
szellőztet AddVerb;
szerződtet AddVerb;
szöktet AddVerb;
szüneteltet AddVerb;
szüntet AddVerb;
süllyesztet AddVerb;
süppesztet AddVerb;
süttet AddVerb;
teliültet AddVerb;
töltet AddVerb;
töppesztet AddVerb;
törlesztet AddVerb;
törtet AddVerb;
tüntet AddVerb;
türtőztet AddVerb;
tüsszentet AddVerb;
tűrtet AddVerb;
vetkőztet AddVerb;
zökkentet AddVerb;
zörrentet AddVerb;
zötyögtet AddVerb;
züllesztet AddVerb;
öltet AddVerb;
öltöztet AddVerb;
ömlesztet AddVerb;
öntet AddVerb;
ültet AddVerb;
üttet AddVerb;
üvöltet AddVerb;
üzemeltet AddVerb;
